Maine, session 132, LD1613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 167 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 167
MAINE'S CARE FORCE
§791. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Maine's Care Force Act."
§792. Definitions
1. Essential support worker. "Essential support worker" has the same meaning as in
section 7401, subsection 3.
2. Participant. "Participant" means an individual enrolled in Maine's Care Force.
3. Placement site. "Placement site" means a location where an essential support worker
is deployed, including a home, health care facility, community center or fire department.
§793. Maine's Care Force
1. Establishment. Maine's Care Force is established within the department.
2. Maine's Care Force Fund. The Maine's Care Force Fund is established as a
nonlapsing fund within and administered by the department to support Maine's Care Force.
The commissioner may accept funds from any public or private source for the purposes
described in this chapter.
3. Authority. In administering Maine's Care Force, the department shall:
A. Develop and deliver essential support worker training and certification programs;
B. Provide health care, housing and subsistence for participants;
C. Deploy essential support workers to underserved areas based on community need;
and
D. Monitor essential support workers and provide ongoing support.
4. Eligibility. To enroll as participants in Maine's Care Force, individuals must:
A. Be at least 18 years of age;
Page 1 - 132LR1848(01)

B. Commit to a 3-year service contract; and
C. Pass a background check and meet screening criteria established by the department.
5. Training. The department shall develop and administer a training curriculum for
participants, which must include:
A. Care of older adults, children and individuals with disabilities;
B. Physical activity and gameplay for the purpose of enhancing resilience and
teamwork;
C. Life skills, financial literacy and English language training; and
D. Certifications in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation and medication
management.
6. Participant benefits. The department shall provide participants with the following:
A. Comprehensive health care coverage, including medical, dental and vision
coverage;
B. Subsidized housing near placement sites, supported by monthly stipends during
training and placement; and
C. Skills certifications.
7. Placement and support of participants. The department shall coordinate
placement of participants for employment in private homes, facilities and community-
based settings and shall provide ongoing mentorship and mental health resources. The
department shall coordinate with placement sites to provide compensation to participants
for services.
8. Funding. The department may accept and administer loans, grants or other funds or
gifts, conditional or otherwise, in furtherance of its functions, from the Federal Government
and from other sources, public or private.
9. Evaluation. The department shall provide for independent evaluations of Maine's
Care Force every 5 years in order to assess effectiveness and recommend improvements.
10. Reports. Beginning January 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the Governor and to the joint committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over health and human services matters that includes:
A. The number of participants trained and placed during the prior year;
B. Retention rates of participants;
C. The results of participant satisfaction surveys; and
D. A financial statement, including expenditures and funding sources.
§794. Rules
The department shall adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to
this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Page 2 - 132LR1848(01)

Maine's Care Force N967
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the Maine's Care Force program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,000,000 $32,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $32,000,000 $32,000,000
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.